Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2507
Commission; meetings; quorum; attendance required; exception.

(1) The commission shall meet at least once every calendar quarter. Meetings shall be held on the first Friday of January, April, July, and October. If such day is a holiday, or if the commission is prevented from meeting on such day, the meeting shall be held on the following Friday. Special meetings may be called at the request of eight voting members. Eight voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(2) Any member of the commission who, without a valid excuse, fails to attend quarterly or special meetings shall be terminated as a member of the commission and a successor shall be appointed to complete the term of office.

Laws 1971, LB 904, § 6;

Laws 1973, LB 37, § 3;

Laws 1976, LB 174, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 52;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 34;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1219;

Laws 1992, LB 862, § 2.